Texas statutes.
OCCUPATIONS CODE

TITLE 3. HEALTH PROFESSIONS

SUBTITLE J. PHARMACY AND PHARMACISTS

CHAPTER 569. REPORTING REQUIREMENTS FOR PROFESSIONAL LIABILITY INSURERS

Sec. 569.001. DUTY TO REPORT. (a) Every insurer or other entity providing pharmacist's professional liability insurance, pharmacy technician professional and supplemental liability insurance, or druggist's professional liability insurance covering a pharmacist, pharmacy technician, pharmacy technician trainee, or pharmacy license holder in this state shall submit to the board the information described in Section 569.002 at the time prescribed.

(b) The information shall be provided with respect to a notice of claim letter or complaint filed against an insured in a court, if the notice or complaint seeks damages relating to the insured's conduct in providing or failing to provide appropriate service within the scope of pharmaceutical care or services, and with respect to settlement of a claim or lawsuit made on behalf of the insured.

(c) If a pharmacist, pharmacy technician, pharmacy technician trainee, or pharmacy licensed in this state does not carry or is not covered by pharmacist's professional liability insurance, pharmacy technician professional and supplemental liability insurance, or druggist's professional liability insurance and is insured by a nonadmitted carrier or other entity providing pharmacy professional liability insurance that does not report under this subtitle, the duty to report information under Section 569.002 is the responsibility of the pharmacist, pharmacy technician, pharmacy technician trainee, or pharmacy license holder.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.314(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 583 (S.B. 869), Sec. 29, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 569.002. INFORMATION TO BE REPORTED. (a) The following information must be furnished to the board not later than the 30th day after receipt by the insurer of the notice of claim letter or complaint from the insured:

(1) the name of the insured and the insured's state pharmacy technician registration number, pharmacy technician trainee registration number, or pharmacist or pharmacy license number;

(2) the policy number; and

(3) a copy of the notice of claim letter or complaint.

(b) The board shall, in consultation with the Texas Department of Insurance, adopt rules for reporting additional information as the board may require. Other claim reports required under state and federal law shall be considered in determining the information to be reported, the form of the report, and frequency of reporting under the rules. Additional information that the board may require may include:

(1) the date of any judgment, dismissal, or settlement; and

(2) whether an appeal has been taken and by which party.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.314(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 583 (S.B. 869), Sec. 30, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 569.003. IMMUNITY FROM LIABILITY. An insurer reporting under this subchapter, its agents or employees, or the board or its employees or representatives are not liable for damages in a suit brought by any person or entity for reporting as required by this subchapter or for any other action taken under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.314(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 569.004. RESTRICTION ON USE OF INFORMATION REPORTED. (a) Information submitted to the board under this subchapter and the fact that the information has been submitted to the board may not be:

(1) offered in evidence or used in any manner in the trial of a suit described in this subchapter; or

(2) used in any manner to determine the eligibility or credentialing of a pharmacy to participate in a health insurance plan defined by the Insurance Code.

(b) Information submitted under this subchapter is confidential and is not subject to disclosure under Chapter 552, Government Code.

(c) The board shall adopt rules to ensure the confidentiality of information submitted under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.314(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 569.005. INVESTIGATION OF REPORT. (a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a report received by the board under this subchapter is not a complaint for which a board investigation is required.

(b) The board shall review the information relating to a pharmacist, pharmacy technician, pharmacy technician trainee, or pharmacy license holder against whom at least three professional liability claims have been reported within a five-year period in the same manner as if a complaint against the pharmacist, pharmacy technician, pharmacy technician trainee, or pharmacy license holder had been made under Chapter 555.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.314(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 583 (S.B. 869), Sec. 31, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 569.006. SANCTIONS IMPOSED ON INSURER. The Texas Department of Insurance may impose on any insurer subject to this subtitle sanctions authorized by Chapter 82, Insurance Code, if the insurer fails to report information as required by this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.314(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.